Mississippi, session 2026, SB2226.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 43-21-157, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-21-157.  (1)  If a child who has reached his * * * thirteenth sixteenth birthday is charged by petition to be a delinquent child, the youth court, either on motion of the youth court prosecutor or on the youth court's own motion, after a hearing as hereinafter provided, may, in its discretion, transfer jurisdiction of the alleged offense described in the petition or a lesser included offense to the criminal court which would have trial jurisdiction of such offense if committed by an adult.  A child who is twelve (12) years of age or younger shall be ineligible for transfer to circuit court.  For a child who is between the ages of thirteen (13) and fifteen (15) to be eligible for transfer to circuit court, the child must previously have been adjudicated delinquent for three (3) felonies and been committed to the state training school at least two (2) times.  The child shall be represented by counsel in transfer proceedings. (2)  A motion to transfer shall be filed on a day prior to the date set for the adjudicatory hearing but not more than ten (10) days after the filing of the petition.  The youth court shall order a transfer study at the time the motion is filed for any youth under the age of sixteen (16).  The youth court may order a transfer study for any child who has reached his sixteenth birthday at * * * any the time * * * after the motion to transfer is filed.  The transfer study and any other social record which the youth court will consider at the transfer hearing shall be made available to the child's counsel prior to the hearing.  Summons shall be served in the same manner as other summons under this chapter with a copy of the motion to transfer and the petition attached thereto. (3)  The transfer hearing shall be bifurcated.  At the transfer hearing, the youth court shall first determine whether probable cause exists to believe that the child committed the alleged offense.  For the purpose of the transfer hearing only, the child may, with the assistance of counsel, waive the determination of probable cause. (4)  Upon such a finding of probable cause, the youth court may transfer jurisdiction of the alleged offense and the youth if the youth court finds by clear and convincing evidence that there are no reasonable prospects of rehabilitation within the juvenile justice system. (5)  The factors which shall be considered by the youth court in determining the reasonable prospects of rehabilitation within the juvenile justice system are: (a)  Whether or not the alleged offense constituted a substantial danger to the public; (b)  The seriousness of the alleged offense; (c)  Whether or not the transfer is required to protect the community; (d)  Whether or not the alleged offense was committed in an aggressive, violent, premeditated or willful manner; (e)  Whether the alleged offense was against persons or against property, greater weight being given to the offense against persons, especially if personal injury resulted; (f)  The sophistication, maturity and educational background of the child; (g)  The child's home situation, emotional condition and lifestyle; (h)  The history of the child, including experience with the juvenile justice system, other courts, probation, commitments to juvenile institutions or other placements; (i)  Whether or not the child can be retained in the juvenile justice system long enough for effective treatment or rehabilitation; (j)  The dispositional resources available to the juvenile justice system; (k)  Dispositional resources available to the adult correctional system for the child if treated as an adult; (l)  Whether the alleged offense was committed on school property, public or private, or at any school-sponsored event, and constituted a substantial danger to other students; and (m)  Any other factors deemed relevant by the youth court * * *; and. * * *  (n)  Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the transfer of jurisdiction of an alleged offense and a child if that child, at the time of the transfer hearing, previously has not been placed in a juvenile institution. (6)  If the youth court transfers jurisdiction of the alleged offense to a criminal court, the youth court shall enter a transfer order containing: (a)  Facts showing that the youth court had jurisdiction of the cause and of the parties; (b)  Facts showing that the child was represented by counsel; (c)  Facts showing that the hearing was held in the presence of the child and his counsel; (d)  A recital of the findings of probable cause and the facts and reasons underlying the youth court's decision to transfer jurisdiction of the alleged offense; (e)  The conditions of custody or release of the child pending criminal court proceedings, including bail or recognizance as the case may justify, as well as a designation of the custodian for the time being; and (f)  A designation of the alleged offense transferred and of the court to which the transfer is made and a direction to the clerk to forward for filing in such court a certified copy of the transfer order of the youth court. (7)  The testimony of the child respondent at a transfer hearing conducted pursuant to this chapter shall not be admissible against the child in any proceeding other than the transfer hearing. (8)  When jurisdiction of an offense is transferred to the circuit court, or when a youth has committed an act which is in original circuit court jurisdiction pursuant to Section 43-21-151, the jurisdiction of the youth court over the youth for any future offenses is terminated, except that jurisdiction over future offenses is not terminated if the circuit court transfers or remands the transferred case to the youth court or if a child who has been transferred to the circuit court or is in the original jurisdiction of the circuit court is not convicted.  However, when jurisdiction of an offense is transferred to the circuit court pursuant to this section or when an offense committed by a youth is in original circuit court jurisdiction pursuant to Section 43-21-151, the circuit court shall thereafter assume and retain jurisdiction of any felony offenses committed by such youth without any additional transfer proceedings.  Any misdemeanor offenses committed by youth who are in circuit court jurisdiction pursuant to this section or Section 43-21-151 shall be prosecuted in the court which would have jurisdiction over that offense if committed by an adult without any additional transfer proceedings.  The circuit court may review the transfer proceedings on motion of the transferred child.  Such review shall be on the record of the hearing in the youth court.  The circuit court shall remand the offense to the youth court if there is no substantial evidence to support the order of the youth court.  The circuit court may also review the conditions of custody or release pending criminal court proceedings. (9)  When any youth has been the subject of a transfer to circuit court for an offense committed in any county of the state or has committed any act which is in the original jurisdiction of the circuit court pursuant to Section 43-21-151, that transfer or original jurisdiction shall be recognized by all other courts of the state and no subsequent offense committed by such youth in any county of the state shall be in the jurisdiction of the youth court unless transferred to the youth court pursuant to Section 43-21-159(3).  Transfers from youth courts of other states shall be recognized by the courts of this state and no youth who has a pending charge or a conviction in the adult court system of any other state shall be in the jurisdiction of the youth courts of this state, but such youths shall be in the jurisdiction of the circuit court for any felony committed in this state or in the jurisdiction of the court of competent jurisdiction for any misdemeanor committed in this state. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.